Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-917
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to administer and to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 28.